Illinois, session 104th, HB1559.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Transportation Law of the 5Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding 6Section 2705-627 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2705/2705-627 new)8    Sec. 2705-627. Uniformity of procedural rules. The 9Department shall develop and implement uniform procedural 10rules for its districts. No district official or official 11acting on behalf of a district shall deviate from the 12procedural rules once established by the Department.